Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-18] Limitation prescribed by state
tax laws as affected by period of service. Section 657D-16 shall not apply
to any period of limitation in state tax laws set forth in title 14. [L
1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next